Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0874.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 236. (1) Subject to the conditions set forth in this
article, the amounts listed in this section are appropriated for
higher education for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026,
2027, from the funds indicated in this section. The following is a
summary of the appropriations in this section and sections 236d ,
236e, and 236j:
(a) The gross appropriation is $2,336,912,000.00.
$2,590,132,800.00. After deducting total interdepartmental grants
and intradepartmental transfers in the amount of $0.00, the
adjusted gross appropriation is $2,336,912,000.00.
$2,590,132,800.00.
(b) The sources of the adjusted gross appropriation described
in subdivision (a) are as follows:
(i) Total federal revenues, $3,200,000.00.
(ii) Total local revenues, $0.00.
(iii) Total private revenues, $0.00.
(iv) Total other state restricted revenues, $850,768,300.00.
$1,171,678,600.00.
(v) State general fund/general purpose money,
$1,482,943,700.00.$1,415,254,200.00.
(c) The totals and subtotals reflected in subdivisions (a) and
(b) do not include amounts appropriated under subsection (7)(d) or
(8)(b) $300,000,000.00 of the appropriation under subsection (8)(c)
to avoid duplicating totals of amounts appropriated in this section
and section 236j.
(2) Amounts appropriated for public universities are as
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


follows:
(a) The appropriation for Central Michigan University is
$99,466,100.00, $95,226,900.00 $99,759,800.00, $97,785,700.00 for
operations, $0.00 for operations increase, $2,558,800.00 for MPSERS
support payment, and $1,680,400.00 $1,974,100.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(b) The appropriation for Eastern Michigan University is
$86,649,200.00, $83,979,800.00 $86,660,200.00, $86,236,300.00 for
operations, $0.00 for operations increase, $2,256,500.00 for MPSERS
support payment, and $412,900.00 $423,900.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(c) The appropriation for Ferris State University is
$62,221,900.00, $59,816,300.00 $62,195,100.00, $61,423,600.00 for
operations, $0.00 for operations increase, $1,607,300.00 for MPSERS
support payment, and $798,300.00 $771,500.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(d) The appropriation for Grand Valley State University is
$98,772,000.00, $98,788,400.00, $97,552,900.00 for operations,
$0.00 for operations increase, $0.00 for MPSERS support payment,
and $1,219,100.00 $1,235,500.00 for costs incurred under the North
American Indian tuition waiver.
(e) The appropriation for Lake Superior State University is
$16,301,400.00, $14,465,600.00 $16,419,200.00, $14,854,300.00 for
operations, $0.00 for operations increase, $388,700.00 for MPSERS
support payment, and $1,447,100.00 $1,564,900.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(f) The appropriation for Michigan State University is
$396,845,300.00, $396,750,000.00, $321,516,900.00 for operations,
$0.00 for operations increase, $0.00 for MPSERS support payment,
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


$2,508,800.00 $2,413,500.00 for costs incurred under the North
American Indian tuition waiver, $39,096,200.00 for MSU
AgBioResearch, and $33,723,400.00 for MSU Extension.
(g) The appropriation for Michigan Technological University is
$56,659,000.00, $54,463,700.00 $56,727,800.00, $55,927,100.00 for
operations, $0.00 for operations increase, $1,463,400.00 for MPSERS
support payment, and $731,900.00 $800,700.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(h) The appropriation for Northern Michigan University is
$55,688,200.00, $52,850,300.00 $55,925,000.00, $54,270,400.00 for
operations, $0.00 for operations increase, $1,420,100.00 for MPSERS
support payment, and $1,417,800.00 $1,654,600.00 for costs incurred
under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(i) The appropriation for Oakland University is
$73,361,600.00, $73,414,700.00, $73,036,400.00 for operations,
$0.00 for operations increase, $0.00 for MPSERS support payment,
and $325,200.00 $378,300.00 for costs incurred under the North
American Indian tuition waiver.
(j) The appropriation for Saginaw Valley State University is
$34,379,000.00, $34,436,800.00, $34,196,000.00 for operations,
$0.00 for operations increase, $0.00 for MPSERS support payment,
and $183,000.00 $240,800.00 for costs incurred under the North
American Indian tuition waiver.
(k) The appropriation for University of Michigan – Ann Arbor
is $362,507,900.00, $362,353,400.00, $360,607,300.00 for
operations, $0.00 for operations increase, $0.00 for MPSERS support
payment, and $1,900,600.00 $1,746,100.00 for costs incurred under
the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(l) The appropriation for University of Michigan – Dearborn is
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


$31,708,000.00, $31,762,500.00, $31,513,700.00 for operations,
$0.00 for operations increase, $0.00 for MPSERS support payment,
and $194,300.00 $248,800.00 for costs incurred under the North
American Indian tuition waiver.
(m) The appropriation for University of Michigan – Flint is
$26,884,600.00, $26,941,300.00, $26,403,700.00 for operations,
$0.00 for operations increase, $0.00 for MPSERS support payment,
and $480,900.00 $537,600.00 for costs incurred under the North
American Indian tuition waiver.
(n) The appropriation for Wayne State University is
$227,787,300.00, $227,908,900.00, $227,310,200.00 for operations,
$0.00 for operations increase, $0.00 for MPSERS support payment,
and $477,100.00 $598,700.00 for costs incurred under the North
American Indian tuition waiver.
(o) The appropriation for Western Michigan University is
$125,246,700.00, $121,231,800.00 $125,265,800.00, $124,489,300.00
for operations, $0.00 for operations increase, $3,257,500.00 for
MPSERS support payment, and $757,400.00 $776,500.00 for costs
incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver.
(3) The amount appropriated in subsection (2) for public
universities is $1,754,478,200.00, $1,755,308,900.00, appropriated
from the following:
(a) State school aid fund, $643,168,300.00.
(b) State general fund/general purpose money,
$1,111,309,900.00.$1,112,140,600.00.
(4) The amount appropriated for Michigan public school
employees' retirement system reimbursement is $0.00.
(5) The amount appropriated for state and regional programs is
$322,100.00, appropriated from general fund/general purpose money
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


and allocated as follows:
(a) Higher education database modernization and conversion,
$200,000.00.
(b) Midwestern Higher Education Compact, $122,100.00.
(6) The amount appropriated for the Martin Luther King, Jr. -
Cesar Chavez Dolores Huerta – Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks program
is $2,691,500.00, appropriated from general fund/general purpose
money and allocated as follows:
(a) Select student support services, $1,956,100.00.
(b) Michigan college/university partnership program,
$586,800.00.
(c) Morris Hood, Jr. educator development program,
$148,600.00.
(7) Subject to subsection (8), the amount appropriated for
grants and financial aid is $469,500,000.00, $760,300,000.00,
allocated as follows:
(a) Tuition incentive program, $122,300,000.00.
$156,100,000.00.
(b) Children of veterans and officer's survivor tuition grant
programs, $2,000,000.00.
(c) Project GEAR-UP, $3,200,000.00.
(d) Michigan achievement scholarships, $300,000,000.00.
$532,000,000.00. From this amount, up to $10,000,000.00 may be used
to award skills scholarships under section 248a.
(e) Michigan reconnect, $42,000,000.00.$67,000,000.00.
(8) The money appropriated in subsection (7) for grants and
financial aid is appropriated from the following:
(a) Federal revenues under the United States Department of
Education, Office of Elementary and Secondary Education, GEAR-UP
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


program, $3,200,000.00.
(b) Postsecondary scholarship fund, $300,000,000.00.
$532,000,000.00.
(c) School aid fund, $25,000,000.00.
(d) (c) State general fund/general purpose money,
$166,300,000.00.$200,100,000.00.
(e) (d) At the close of the fiscal year, state general
fund/general purpose money appropriated in subsection (7) for
grants and scholarships that is unspent must be deposited into the
postsecondary scholarship fund created in section 236j.
(9) For fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 only, in addition to
the allocation under subsection (4), from the appropriations
described in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $7,600,000.00 $1,750,000.00 for payments to participating
public universities, appropriated from the state school aid fund. A
public university that receives money under this subsection shall
use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting the normal cost
contribution rate. As used in this subsection, "participating
public universities" means public universities that are a reporting
unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system
under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA
300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that pay contributions to the
Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the state
fiscal year.
(10) It is the intent of the legislature that $43,500,000.00
of the general fund/general purpose money appropriated in
subsections (7)(a) and (8)(d) for the tuition incentive program is
for the fiscal year 2026-2027 only.
Sec. 236c. In addition to the funds appropriated for fiscal
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


year 2025-2026 2026-2027 in section 236, appropriations to the
department of technology, management, and budget in the act
providing general appropriations for fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-
2027 for state building authority rent, totaling an estimated
$142,153,900.00, $153,218,900.00, provide funding for the state
share of costs for previously constructed capital projects for
state universities. These appropriations for state building
authority rent represent additional state general fund support
provided to public universities, and the following is an estimate
of the amount of that support to each public university:
(a) Central Michigan University, $12,914,000.00.
(b) Eastern Michigan University, $6,022,000.00. $8,272,000.00.
(c) Ferris State University, $9,546,000.00.
(d) Grand Valley State University, $8,614,000.00.
$10,864,000.00.
(e) Lake Superior State University, $2,229,000.00.
(f) Michigan State University, $16,598,000.00.
(g) Michigan Technological University, $5,521,000.00.
(h) Northern Michigan University, $9,735,900.00.
(i) Oakland University, $11,245,000.00.$13,310,000.00.
(j) Saginaw Valley State University, $7,820,000.00.
(k) University of Michigan - Ann Arbor, $14,068,000.00.
(l) University of Michigan - Dearborn, $10,725,000.00.
(m) University of Michigan - Flint, $6,057,000.00.
$8,307,000.00.
(n) Wayne State University, $10,072,000.00.$12,322,000.00.
(o) Western Michigan University, $10,987,000.00.
Sec. 236d. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated under
section 232(2) for university operations, for fiscal year 2025-2026
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


2026-2027 only, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed
$50,114,100.00 $69,760,300.00 from the state general fund/general
purpose money school aid fund for 1-time operations increase
payments. These funds are intended to be used for the same purposes
as the funds appropriated under section 236(2) for university
operations.
(2) From the amount appropriated under subsection (1), subject
to sections 241a, 241b, 241c, 241e, and 244, each university is
allocated the following:
(a) Central Michigan University, $2,885,000.00.$3,920,600.00.
(b) Eastern Michigan University, $2,544,200.00.$3,457,500.00.
(c) Ferris State University, $1,812,200.00.$2,462,700.00.
(d) Grand Valley State University, $2,955,400.00.
$3,911,200.00.
(e) Lake Superior State University, $438,300.00.$595,600.00.
(f) Michigan State University, $9,740,500.00.$12,890,700.00.
(g) Michigan Technological University,
$1,650,000.00.$2,242,300.00.
(h) Northern Michigan University, $1,601,100.00.$2,175,900.00.
(i) Oakland University, $2,212,700.00.$2,928,300.00.
(j) Saginaw Valley State University,
$1,036,000.00.$1,371,000.00.
(k) University of Michigan – Ann Arbor,
$10,924,800.00.$14,458,000.00.
(l) University of Michigan – Dearborn,
$954,700.00.$1,263,500.00.
(m) University of Michigan – Flint, $799,900.00.$1,058,600.00.
(n) Wayne State University, $6,886,500.00.$9,113,600.00.
(o) Western Michigan University, $3,672,800.00.$4,991,200.00.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in section 236(2)
for MSU AgBioResearch, for fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 only,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,184,400.00
$1,567,500.00 from the state general fund/general purpose money for
MSU AgBioResearch.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in section 236(2)
for MSU Extension, for fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 only, there
is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,021,700.00 $1,352,100.00
from the state general fund/general purpose money for MSU
Extension.
Sec. 236j. (1) The postsecondary scholarship fund is created
in the department of treasury for the purpose of providing
scholarship awards to eligible students who attend eligible
postsecondary educational institutions in this state, as provided
in subsection (5).
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the postsecondary scholarship fund. The
state treasurer shall direct the investment of the postsecondary
scholarship fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the
postsecondary scholarship fund interest and earnings from
postsecondary scholarship fund investments.
(3) Money in the postsecondary scholarship fund at the close
of the fiscal year must remain in the postsecondary scholarship
fund and not lapse to the general fund.
(4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the
postsecondary scholarship fund for auditing purposes.
(5) Money must be expended from the postsecondary scholarship
fund only for the purpose of providing Michigan achievement
scholarship awards to eligible students who attend eligible
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


postsecondary educational institutions in this state and for other
purposes described in this section. From Subject to section 236k,
from the funds appropriated in section 236(7) for the Michigan
achievement scholarship, the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential may use up to $10,000,000.00
$5,000,000.00 annually for the purposes of outreach programs to
raise awareness of the Michigan achievement scholarship and other
state scholarship programs allocated in section 236(7). The
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall
ensure that state scholarships are well publicized and that high
school students are provided information on the availability of
financial aid. The department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential may receive and expend funds received from outside
sources for scholarships, marketing, or other purposes related to
Michigan state scholarships. The department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential shall provide the necessary funding and
staff to fully operate the programs.
(6) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, 2027,
$300,000,000.00 $200,000,000.00 of ongoing funding is deposited
into the postsecondary scholarship fund from the following:
(a) State state school aid fund. , $200,000,000.00.
(b) State general fund/general purpose money, $100,000,000.00.
(7) In addition to the deposit under subsection (6), for the
fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 only, $100,000,000.00 is
deposited into the postsecondary scholarship fund from state
general fund/general purpose money.
(8) (7) It is the intent of the legislature that the
postsecondary scholarship fund serves as the primary funding source
of the Michigan achievement scholarship. To ensure the Michigan
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


achievement scholarship provides ongoing supports for students, it
is the intent of the legislature to increase annual deposits into
the postsecondary scholarship fund until the fully implemented
costs of the Michigan achievement scholarship are deposited
annually into the postsecondary scholarship fund.
(9) (8) In addition to the appropriations in section 236, if
the amount of general fund money state funds allocated in section
236(7)(a), (b), (d), or (e) is not sufficient to fully fund 1 or
more of those awards, there is appropriated from the postsecondary
scholarship fund the amount necessary to fully fund those awards.
The state budget director must determine if money is appropriated
from the postsecondary scholarship fund under this subsection and
shall provide written notification to the house and senate
appropriations subcommittee on higher education and the house and
senate fiscal agencies prior to any additional appropriation
described in this subsection.
(9) In addition to the deposit to the postsecondary
scholarship fund described in subsection (6), for the fiscal year
ending September 30, 2025 only, an amount not to exceed
$80,000,000.00 from the unspent and unreserved state school aid
fund balances appropriated under section 11, as recorded as part of
the state book-closing process for the 2024-2025 fiscal year, is
deposited into the postsecondary scholarship fund.
Sec. 236k. From the amount described under section 236j(5) for
marketing of the Michigan achievement scholarship and other state
scholarship programs, $1,000,000.00 must be allocated for the FAFSA
completion ticket to tuition incentive. The department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall use funds described
under this section to run a promotional activity to promote
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


completing the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) for
the first time consistent with the promotional-activity exception
provided for in section 372(2) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA
328, MCL 750.372. The promotional activity must offer prize funds
that are available to a number, chosen by the department, of
randomly selected Michigan residents who satisfactorily demonstrate
to the department that they have completed the FAFSA for the first
time.
Sec. 236s. (1) Not later than Within 30 days after of the
enactment of the an amendatory act that added this section, to this
article, the legislature house and senate shall provide to the
responsible entity and the state budget director office a jointly
agreed upon list of legislatively directed spending items , which
may be referred to in this section as grants or direct
appropriation grants, funded under the amendatory act that added
this section consistent with house or senate rules and this
section. funded by the amendatory act. The list must include all
information and documents pertaining to the funded items as
publicly disclosed in accordance with house or senate rules and
this section. section 364 and 364a of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1634a. As used in this
subsection, "legislatively directed spending item" means that term
as defined in section 364 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA
431, MCL 18.1364.
(2) Notwithstanding any other conditions or requirements for
direct appropriation grants, the responsible entity shall perform,
at a minimum, at least all of the following activities to
administer the grants described in subsection (1):
(a) Establish a process to review, complete, and execute a
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


grant agreement with a grant recipient. The responsible entity
shall not execute a grant agreement unless all necessary
documentation has been submitted and reviewed.
(b) Verify to the extent possible that a grant recipient is a
not-for-profit entity and will use funds as publicly disclosed and
for a public purpose that serves the economic prosperity, health,
safety, or general welfare of the residents of this state.
(c) Review and verify all necessary information to ensure the
grant recipient is reasonably able to execute the grant agreement,
perform its fiduciary duty, and comply with all applicable state
and federal statutes. The responsible entity may deduct the cost of
background checks and any other efforts performed as part of this
verification from the amount of the designated grant award.
(d) Disburse the grant money per the grant disbursement
schedule in the executed grant agreement on a reimbursement basis
after the grantee has provided sufficient documentation, as
determined by the responsible entity, to verify that expenditures
were made in accordance with the project purpose.
(e) If the state budget director determines that information
provided by the grantee does not meet the disclosure requirements,
that the grant will be used to pay a tax lien, delinquent tax, or
other obligation owed to this state, or that the grant will create
a conflict of interest, the responsible entity shall not release
the grant money to the grantee. Money that is not released under
this subdivision lapses at the end of the fiscal year. There is not
a conflict of interest if the sponsoring legislator certifies that
the sponsoring legislator's immediate family members, legislative
staff members that have worked for the sponsoring legislator within
the past 2 years, and the sponsoring legislator do not have a
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


direct or indirect pecuniary interest in the legislatively directed
spending item.
(3) An executed grant agreement under this section between the
responsible entity and a grant recipient must include at least all
of the following:
(a) All necessary identifying information for the grant
recipient, including any tax and financial information necessary
for the responsible entity to administer grant money under this
section.
(b) A description of the project for which the grant money
will be expended, including tentative timelines and the estimated
budget. Project budget must include how all grant money will be
used and must indicate if any grant money will be provided to a
third party or subrecipient. The responsible entity shall not
reimburse expenditures that are outside of the project purpose, as
stated in the executed grant agreement, from appropriations under
the amendatory act that added this section. The grantee shall
return to the state treasury any interest in excess of $1,000.00
earned on the grant money while unexpended and in possession of the
grantee.
(c) Unless otherwise specified in the responsible entity's
policy, a requirement that funds appropriated for the grants
described in subsection (1) may be used only for expenditures that
occur on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that
added this section.
(d) A requirement for reporting by the grant recipient to the
responsible entity and the legislative sponsor that provides the
status of the project and an accounting of all money expended by
the grant recipient, as determined by the responsible entity.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(e) A clawback provision that allows the department of
treasury to recoup or otherwise collect any grant money that is
declined, unspent, or otherwise misused.
(f) The documents publicly disclosed under subsection (1).
(4) If appropriate to improve the administration or oversight
of a grant described in subsection (1), the responsible entity may
adopt a memorandum of understanding with another state department
to perform the required duties under this section.
(5) A grant recipient shall respond to all reasonable
information requests from the responsible entity related to grant
expenditures and retain grant records for not less than 7 years,
and the grant may be subject to monitoring, site visits, and audit
as determined by the responsible entity. The grant agreement
required under this section must include signed assurance by the
chief executive officer or other executive officer of the grant
recipient authorized to bind the grant recipient that the
requirements of this subsection will be met.
(6) The grant recipient shall expend all grant money awarded
and complete all projects not later than September 30, 2030. If at
that time any unexpended money remains, the grant recipient shall
return that money to the state treasury. If a grant recipient does
not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not
later than June 1, 2026, the responsible entity shall return money
associated with the grant to the state treasury.
(7) Any grant money that is awarded to a responsible entity is
appropriated in that responsible entity for the purpose of the
intended grant.
(2) (8) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9),
beginning March 15 of the current fiscal year, the responsible
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


entity In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364(4), the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The report must list the grant recipient,
project purpose, and location of the project for each grant
described in subsection (1), the status of money allocated and
disbursed under the grant agreement, and the legislative sponsor,
if applicable. The responsible entity The department or agency
shall update the report and post the an updated report in a
publicly accessible location on its website not later than June 15
of the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The responsible entity department or
agency shall include in the report the most comprehensive
information the responsible entity department or agency has
available at the time of posting for grants awarded.
(9) If the state budget office determines that it is more
efficient for the state budget office to compile all affected
responsible entities' information and post a report of the compiled
information rather than the report required under subsection (8)
being posted by individual responsible entities, the state budget
office may compile that information across all affected responsible
entities and other state departments and post the compiled report
and any updates on the same time schedule as identified in
subsection (8).
(10) If the responsible entity reasonably determines that the
money allocated for an executed grant agreement under this section
was misused or that use of the money was misrepresented by the
grant recipient, the responsible entity shall not award any
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


additional funds under the executed grant agreement and shall refer
the grant for review following internal audit protocols, which may
include referral for criminal investigation.
(11) As used in this section, "responsible entity" means the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, a
public university, or other person that administers a grant under
this article.
Sec. 241. Subject to sections 241a, 241b, 241c, 241e, 241h,
and 244, the funds appropriated in sections 236 and 236d to public
universities must be paid out of the state treasury and distributed
by the state treasurer to the respective institutions in 11 equal
monthly installments on the sixteenth of each month, or the next
succeeding business day, beginning with October 16, 2025. 2026.
Except for Wayne State University, each institution shall accrue
its July and August 2026 2027 payments to its institutional fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026.2027.
Sec. 241a. (1) All public universities shall submit higher
education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) data and associated
financial aid program information requested by and in a manner
prescribed by the state budget director. For public universities
with fiscal years ending June 30, these data must be submitted to
the state budget director by October 15 of each fiscal year. Public
universities with a fiscal year ending September 30 shall submit
preliminary HEIDI data by November 15 and final data by December
15.
(2) It is intended that accountability reporting for public
universities will be streamlined through HEIDI. The state budget
director and the center will work to combine the reporting
requirements outlined in this subsection with the existing HEIDI
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


collection cycle. All of the following must be reported to the
house and senate fiscal agencies and the state budget director:
(a) Each public university's certification of its compliance
with the requirements described in subsections (4), and (5), and
(6).
(b) The reporting requirements described in sections 241b and
241c.
(3) If a public university fails to submit HEIDI data and
associated financial aid program information reporting in sections
241a, 241b, 241c, and 244 in accordance with the required reporting
schedule, the state treasurer budget director may withhold the
monthly operations installments under section sections 236 and 236d
to the public university until those data reports are submitted. If
a public university does not comply with all of the requirements
described in subsections (4) and (5) sections 241a, 241b, 241c, and
244 by the end of the fiscal year, the public university forfeits
the amount withheld. The state budget director shall notify the
chairs of the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on
higher education at least 10 days before withholding funds from any
public university.
(4) No later than the first business day of November 1 of each
year, a public university shall maintain a public transparency
website available through a link on its website homepage. The
website must include all of the following concerning the public
university:
(a) The annual operating budget and subsequent budget
revisions.
(b) A summary of current expenditures for the most recent
fiscal year for which they are available, expressed as pie charts
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


in the following 2 categories:
(i) A chart of personnel expenditures, broken into the
following subcategories:
(A) Earnings and wages.
(B) Employee benefit costs, including, but not limited to,
medical, dental, vision, life, disability, and long-term care
benefits.
(C) Retirement benefit costs.
(D) All other personnel costs.
(ii) A chart of all current expenditures the public university
reported as part of its higher education institutional data
inventory data under subsection (1), broken into the same
subcategories in which it reported those data.
(c) Links to all of the following for the public university:
(i) The current collective bargaining agreement for each
bargaining unit.
(ii) Each health care benefits plan, including, but not limited
to, medical, dental, vision, disability, long-term care, or any
other type of benefits that would constitute health care services,
offered to any bargaining unit or employee of the public
university.
(iii) Audits and financial reports for the most recent fiscal
year for which they are available.
(d) General fund revenue and expenditure projections for the
current fiscal year and the next fiscal year.
(e) A listing of all debt service obligations, detailed by
project, anticipated fiscal year payment for each project, and
total outstanding debt for the current fiscal year.
(f) The institution's policy regarding the transferability of
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


core college courses between community colleges and the public
university.
(g) A listing of all community colleges that have entered into
reverse transfer agreements with the public university.
(h) A dashboard or report card demonstrating the public
university's performance in several "best practice" measures. The
dashboard or report card must include at least all of the following
for the 3 most recent academic years for which the data are
available:
(i) Enrollment.
(ii) Student retention rate.
(iii) Six-year graduation rates.
(iv) Number of Pell grant recipients and graduating Pell grant
recipients.
(v) Geographic origination of students, categorized as in-
state, out-of-state, and international.
(vi) Faculty to student ratios and total public university
employee to student ratios.
(vii) Teaching load by faculty classification.
(viii) Graduation outcome rates, including employment and
continuing education.
(i) An icon badge that provides statewide consistency and
public visibility. For this purpose, public universities shall use
the icon badge provided by the department of technology,
management, and budget consistent with the icon badge developed by
the department of education for K-12 school districts. It must
appear on the front of each public university's homepage. The size
of the icon may be reduced to 150 x 150 pixels. The font size and
style for this reporting must be consistent with other documents on
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


each public university's website.
(j) A collection and report of the number and percentage of
all enrolled students who complete the Free Application for Federal
Student Aid, broken out by undergraduate and graduate/professional
classifications, reported to the center and posted on its website
under the budget transparency icon badge.
(k) The name of the current president, the names of the city
and state where the president currently resides, and the
president's annual salary.
(l) A list of severance payments and the amounts of those
payments made to former employees of the university.
(5) No later than the first business day of November 1 of each
year, a public university shall develop, maintain, and update a
"campus safety information and resources" link, prominently
displayed on the homepage of its website, to a section of its
website containing, at a minimum, all of the following information:
(a) Emergency contact numbers for police, fire, health, and
other services.
(b) Hours, locations, telephone numbers, and email contacts
for campus public safety offices and title IX offices.
(c) A list of safety and security services provided by the
public university, including transportation, escort services,
building surveillance, anonymous tip lines, and other available
security services.
(d) The public university's policies applicable to minors on
university property.
(e) A directory of resources available at the public
university or surrounding community for students or employees who
are survivors of sexual assault or sexual abuse.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(f) An electronic copy of "A Resource Handbook for Campus
Sexual Assault Survivors, Friends and Family", published in 2018.
(g) Campus security policies and crime statistics pursuant to
the student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-
542, 104 Stat 2381. Information must include all material prepared
pursuant to the public information reporting requirements under the
crime awareness and campus security act of 1990, title II of the
student right-to-know and campus security act, Public Law 101-542,
104 Stat 2381.
(6) Each public university shall certify to the state budget
director by the first business day of November of each year that it
complies with all of the following requirements:
(a) The public university participates in reverse transfer
agreements described in section 286 with at least 3 community
colleges in this state.
(b) The public university does not and will not apply any of
the following criteria when determining whether credits earned
outside the public university by a student count toward a degree or
certificate program offered by the public university:
(i) Whether the credits were earned in a dual enrollment
program that counted the credits toward high school graduation
requirements.
(ii) Whether the credits were earned in a course that was
delivered in a high school classroom, community college classroom
or campus, or another location.
(iii) Whether the credits were earned in a course that was
delivered online, in person, or hybrid.
(iv) Whether other students enrolled in the course in which the
credits were earned were enrolled in high school or counted the
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


course toward high school graduation requirements.
(c) The public university actively participates in and submits
timely updates to the Michigan Transfer Network created as part of
the Michigan Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions
Officers transfer agreement.
Sec. 241b. (1) No later than the first business day of
November 1 of each year, each public university that receives an
appropriation in section 236 shall report its annual security
report, also known as the Clery Act Report, as required under 20
USC 1092(f). Each public university shall include a title IX
summary report that includes all of the following information:
(a) The amounts and descriptions of all fees incurred in title
IX-related civil and criminal litigation.
(b) The number of title IX complaints.
(c) The average length of time for investigation and
resolution of title IX complaints.
(d) The aggregate number of title IX cases, investigations,
and complaints for each of the categories described in
subparagraphs (i) to (v), subject to subparagraph (vi), as follows:
(i) Cases investigated for less than 15 days.
(ii) Cases investigated for at least 15 days and less than 30
days.
(iii) Cases investigated for at least 30 days and less than 60
days.
(iv) Cases investigated for at least 60 days and less than 90
days.
(v) Cases investigated for 90 days or more.
(vi) If, for any category of cases under subparagraphs (i) to
(v), there is an aggregate of fewer than 5 cases investigated, the
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


public university shall not report the aggregate number of cases
and instead shall report that fewer than 5 cases were investigated.
(e) The number of title IX appeals and the resolutions of
those appeals.
(f) The number of title IX-related complaints filed by the
public university with law enforcement agencies.
(2) No later than the first business day of November 1 of each
year, each public university that receives an appropriation in
section 236 shall certify all of the following:
(a) The public university complies with federal regulations
under title IX, as required by the United States Department of
Education, including, but not limited to, the following:
(i) Use of medical experts that do not have an actual or
apparent conflict of interest.
(ii) Issuance of title IX reports to complainants and
respondents that are not divergent.
(iii) Notification of resources to each individual who reports
having experienced sexual assault by a public university member.
(iv) Consistent annual training for title IX staff and law
enforcement.
(b) The public university provides both of the following:
(i) An in-person sexual misconduct prevention presentation or
course for all freshman and incoming transfer students, which must
include contact information for the title IX office of the public
university. For a student who does not have any in-person credit
hours on campus, the university may provide the presentation or
course electronically.
(ii) An online or electronic sexual misconduct prevention
presentation or course for all students not considered freshmen or
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


incoming transfer students.
(c) The public university had a third party review its title
IX compliance office and related policies and procedures by the end
of the 2018-2019 academic year. A copy of the third-party review
must be transmitted to the state budget director, the house and
senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education, and the
house and senate fiscal agencies. Each public university shall have
a third-party review once every 4 years and a copy of the third-
party review must be transmitted to the state budget director, the
house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education,
and the house and senate fiscal agencies.
(d) The public university requires that the governing board
and the president or chancellor of the public university receive
quarterly reports from their title IX coordinator or title IX
office. The report must contain aggregated data of the number of
sexual misconduct reports that the office received for the academic
year, the types of reports received, including reports received
against employees, and a summary of the general outcomes of the
reports and investigations. A member of the governing board may
request to review a title IX investigation report involving a
complaint against an employee, and the public university shall
provide the report in a manner it considers appropriate. The public
university shall protect the complainant's anonymity, and the
report must not contain specific identifying information.
(e) If allegations against an employee are made in more than 1
title IX complaint that resulted in the public university finding
that no misconduct occurred, the public university requires that
the title IX officer promptly notify the president or chancellor
and a member of the public university's governing board in writing
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


and take all appropriate steps to ensure that the matter is being
investigated thoroughly, including hiring an outside investigator
for future cases involving that employee. A third-party title IX
investigation under this subdivision does not prohibit the public
university from simultaneously conducting its own title IX
investigation through its own title IX coordinator.
(f) The public university's president or chancellor and a
member of its governing board has reviewed all title IX reports
involving the alleged sexual misconduct of an employee of the
public university.
(3) As used in this section, "sexual misconduct" includes, but
is not limited to, intimate partner violence, nonconsensual sexual
conduct, sexual assault, sexual exploitation, sexual harassment,
and stalking.
Sec. 241c. (1) No later than the first last business day of
November August of each year, each public university that receives
an appropriation in section 236 shall submit the amount of tuition
and fees actually charged to a full-time resident undergraduate
student for academic year 2025-2026 2026-2027 as part of the public
university's higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI)
data. A public university shall report any revisions for any
semester of the reported academic year to HEIDI within 15 days of
being adopted.
(2) Payments under section 236d must be made only to a public
university that certifies provides the following certifications to
the state budget director by the first last business day of
November August of each year: that its board did not adopt an
increase in tuition and fee rates for resident undergraduate
students after September 1, 2024 for the 2024-2025 academic year
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


and that its board will not adopt an increase in tuition and fee
rates for resident undergraduate students for the 2025-2026
academic year that is greater than 4.5% or $735.00, whichever is
greater. For the academic year 2026-2027, the tuition and fee
restraint rate for resident undergraduate students is an increase
of not greater than 4.0% or $651.00, whichever is greater. It is
the intent of the legislature that in the next fiscal year, the
tuition and fee restraint rate will be adjusted only for the
subsequent academic year. As used in this subsection:
(a) "Fee" means any board-authorized fee that will be paid by
more than 1/2 of all resident undergraduate students at least once
during their enrollment at a public university, as described in the
higher education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) user manual.
A public university increasing a fee that applies to a specific
subset of students or courses shall provide sufficient information
to prove that the increase applied to that subset will not cause
the increase in the average amount of board-authorized total
tuition and fees paid by resident undergraduate students in the
academic year to exceed the limit established in this subsection.
(b) "Tuition and fee rate" means the average of full-time
rates paid by a majority of students in each undergraduate class,
based on an unweighted average of the rates authorized by the
public university board and actually charged to students, deducting
any uniformly rebated or refunded amounts, for the 2 semesters with
the highest levels of full-time equated resident undergraduate
enrollment during the academic year, as described in the higher
education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) user manual.
(3) Each public university shall certify to the state budget
director by the first business day of November each year that it
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


complies with all of the following requirements:
(a) The public university participates in reverse transfer
agreements described in section 286 with at least 3 community
colleges in this state.
(b) The public university does not and will not apply any of
the following criteria when determining whether credits earned
outside the public university by a student count toward a degree or
certificate program offered by the public university:
(i) Whether the credits were earned in a dual enrollment
program that counted the credits toward high school graduation
requirements.
(ii) Whether the credits were earned in a course that was
delivered in a high school classroom, community college classroom
or campus, or another location.
(iii) Whether the credits were earned in a course that was
delivered online, in person, or hybrid.
(iv) Whether other students enrolled in the course in which the
credits were earned were enrolled in high school or counted the
course toward high school graduation requirements.
(c) The public university actively participates in and submits
timely updates to the Michigan Transfer Network created as part of
the Michigan Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions
Officers transfer agreement.
(a) That the university's board did not adopt an increase in
tuition and fee rates for resident undergraduate students after
September 1, 2025 for the 2025-2026 academic year and that its
board will not adopt an increase in tuition and fee rates for
resident undergraduate students for the 2026-2027 academic year
that is greater than 4.0% or $651.00, whichever is greater. For the
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


academic year 2027-2028, the tuition and fee restraint rate for
resident undergraduate students is an increase of not greater than
3.5% or $599.00, whichever is greater.
(b) For academic year 2027-2028, either of the following:
(i) That the university does not have a mandatory on-campus
housing policy reportable under section 275m.
(ii) That the university does have a mandatory on-campus
housing policy reportable under section 275m, and that it will not
adopt an increase in room and board charges that would cause the
average charge for academic year 2027-2028 relative to academic
year 2027-2028 reported under section 275m to increase by an amount
exceeding 3.5% or $446.00, whichever is greater.
(3) (4) The state budget director shall implement uniform
reporting requirements to ensure that a public university receiving
a payment under section 236d has satisfied the tuition restraint
requirements of this section. The state budget director has the
sole authority to determine if a public university has met the
requirements of this section. Information reported by a public
university to the state budget director under this subsection must
also be reported to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on higher education and the house and senate fiscal
agencies.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Fee" means any public university board-authorized fee
that will be paid by more than 1/2 of all resident undergraduate
students at least once during their enrollment at the public
university, as described in the higher education institutional data
inventory (HEIDI) user manual. A public university increasing a fee
that applies to a specific subset of students or courses shall
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


provide sufficient information to prove that the increase applied
to that subset will not cause the increase in the average amount of
board-authorized total tuition and fees paid by resident
undergraduate students in the academic year to exceed the limit
established in this subsection.
(b) "Room and board charges" means 1 or more accommodations
and meal plans used by a public university to calculate the average
charge reported under section 275m(1)(c).
(c) "Tuition and fee rate" means the average of full-time
rates paid by a majority of students in each undergraduate class,
based on an unweighted average of the rates authorized by the
public university board and actually charged to students, deducting
any uniformly rebated or refunded amounts, for the 2 semesters with
the highest levels of full-time equated resident undergraduate
enrollment during the academic year, as described in the higher
education institutional data inventory (HEIDI) user manual.
Sec. 241e. (1) Payments under section 236 for operations
increase 236d must be made only to a public university that
certifies to the state budget director of the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential, or the director's
designee, by the last business day of August of each year that it
complies with the following:
(a) The institutional best practice described in subdivision
(c).
(b) One or more of the institutional best practices described
in subdivisions (d) to (g).
(a) (c) The public university accepts the Michigan Transfer
Agreement, partners with the Michigan Transfer Network, and
promotes clear transfer pathways for interested students by doing
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


all of the following:
(i) Has a policy to help transfer or accept associate degrees
from other accredited Michigan postsecondary education
institutions.
(ii) Publishes the policy described in subparagraph (i) on the
institution's website in an easily accessible way and in admissions
materials.
(iii) Provides publicly available information on the Michigan
Transfer Network, applicable transfer pathways, and financial aid
available to transfer students, at no cost to the student.
(iv) Begins negotiations to increase the number of reverse
transfer agreements or articulation agreements and reports on the
progress toward completing the agreements to the state budget
director by the last business day in February.
(b) (d) The public university requires all students to receive
an academic degree or certificate map that outlines required course
sequencing, program and institution requirements, declared minor
program academic requirements, and a recommended timeline within
which courses should be taken and in which specific semester or
term in order to satisfy all program requirements to allow the
student to graduate on time.
(c) (e) The public university provides non-credit-bearing
developmental or remedial courses at a reduced cost to students.
(d) (f) The public university provides each degree- or
certificate-seeking student with a designated, trained academic
advisor to support student retention, persistence, and completion.
The public university shall require students to meet with their
academic advisor at least once per semester or term.
(e) (g) The public university provides employees during
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


business hours to assist prospective and current students complete
the Free Application for Federal Student Aid.
(f) The public university has adopted a corequisite model of
academic support for gateway English and mathematics courses in
which a student concurrently enrolls in a developmental education
course and a gateway-level course in a subject area where the
student requires remediation. The public university must ensure
that not more than 10% of students assessed as being in need of
developmental or remedial learning participate in a non-co-
requisite developmental or remedial course.
(g) The public university has a policy and process for
assessing prior learning and knowledge that aligns with a student's
academic program and other required coursework. The policy must
include the opportunity for a student to earn credit toward a
degree or certificate, must be available to all students at no cost
to the student, and must be easily accessible on the public
university's website and in admissions materials.
(2) The state budget director of the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential, or the director's designee,
shall implement uniform reporting requirements to ensure that a
public university receiving a payment under section 236 for
operations increase 236d has satisfied the institutional best
practices requirements of this section. The state budget director
of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential, or the director's designee, has the sole authority to
determine if a public university has met the requirements of this
section. Information reported by a public university to the state
budget director of the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, or the director's designee, under this
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


subsection must also be reported to the house and senate
appropriations subcommittees on higher education and the house and
senate fiscal agencies.
(3) If a public university fails to comply with the
certification requirements of this section, the state treasurer may
withhold the monthly installments under section 241 to the public
university until the report is submitted. If a public university
does not comply with the certification requirements described in
this section by the end of the fiscal year, the public university
forfeits the amount withheld. Forfeited funds must lapse to the
fund from which the funds were appropriated. The state budget
director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential, or the director's designee, shall notify the chairs of
the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher
education at least 10 days before withholding funds from any public
university.
(4) No later than the last business day of November of each
year, each public university that receives a payment under section
236d must provide a report to the director of the department of
lifelong education, advancement, and potential, or the director's
designee, that includes the following information for the prior
academic year:
(a) College persistence for on-time completion defined by 30
credits completed for every 12 consecutive months of enrollment for
certificate- or degree-seeking students.
(b) College completion defined by certificate or degree
conferral.
Sec. 247. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for
Michigan reconnect must be distributed and administered by the
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential
pursuant to the Michigan reconnect grant act, 2020 PA 84, MCL
390.1701 to 390.1709, the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act,
2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1711 to 390.1723, and the department's
administrative procedures for Michigan reconnect.
(2) For fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 only, the department
of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may use the funds
appropriated in section 236 for Michigan reconnect to support
students who are receiving awards under the temporary "ARP -
Michigan reconnect expansion to 21" program described in 2023 PA
119.
Sec. 248. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for
Michigan achievement scholarships must be distributed as provided
in this section and section 248a, pursuant to the administrative
procedures for Michigan achievement scholarships of the department.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Cost of attendance" means expenses for a student's
tuition, mandatory fees, and contact hours for the student's actual
program of study; books, supplies, and equipment required for
courses of instruction; housing and food costs; transportation
expenses; federal student loan fees; miscellaneous expenses,
including a reasonable amount for the documented cost of a personal
computer, allowance for child care, or allowance for other
dependent care; costs related to a disability; costs of obtaining a
license, certification, or first professional credential; and
reasonable costs for study abroad programs.
(b) "Department" means the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential.
(c) "Eligible institution" means a public university that
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


receives an appropriation in section 236, a community college that
receives an appropriation in section 201, a federally recognized
tribal college in this state, or an independent nonprofit college
or university in this state as described in section 1 of 1966 PA
313, MCL 390.991.
(d) "Gift aid" includes federal Pell grants under 20 USC
1070a, tuition incentive program benefits under section 256, state
tuition grants under section 252, awards received for minimum
payments awarded in subsection (4), higher education expenses paid
under the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL
390.1661 to 390.1679, and all other federal, state, local, or
institutional aid in the form of grants, scholarships, or discounts
applied toward tuition and mandatory fees. Gift aid does not
include student loans, work-study awards, qualified withdrawals
made from education savings accounts to pay higher education
expenses pursuant to the Michigan education savings program act,
2000 PA 161, MCL 390.1471 to 390.1486, or higher education expenses
paid under the Michigan education trust program pursuant to the
Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to
390.1442.
(e) "High school equivalency certificate" means that term as
defined in section 4.
(f) "Last-dollar payment amount" means 1 of the following:
(i) For a student attending a community college or federally
recognized tribal college, an amount equal to the student's
tuition, mandatory fees, and contact hours for the student's actual
program of study, minus all gift aid received by the student.
(ii) For a student attending a public university or an
independent nonprofit college or university, or for a student
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121
of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121, an
amount equal to the student's individual cost of attendance, minus
all gift aid received by the student.
(g) "Minimum payment" means a payment for any eligible cost
within the student's individual cost of attendance. The minimum
payment must be awarded as a separate payment not included in the
student's need-based financial aid. The minimum payment must not be
reduced.
(h) "SAI eligible student" means a student who has completed
the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and meets at least 1
of the following:
(i) For awards made during academic year 2023-2024, has an
expected family contribution of $25,000.00 or less. An individual
is considered to have met the requirements of subsection (4) if the
individual received the Michigan achievement scholarship in
academic year 2023-2024, was determined to have an expected family
contribution of $25,000.00 or less in academic year 2023-2024, and
has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the
subsequent award cycles.
(ii) For awards made during academic year 2024-2025 or a
subsequent academic year, has completed the Free Application for
Federal Student Aid and has a student aid index number of 1 of the
following, as applicable:
(A) For a student indicating on the student's Free Application
for Federal Student Aid that the student is the only member of the
student's household or the student's parents' household attending a
postsecondary institution during that academic year, $30,000.00 or
less.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(B) For a student indicating on the student's Free Application
for Federal Student Aid that the student is not the only member of
the student's household or the student's parents' household
attending a postsecondary institution during that academic year,
the greater of the number described in sub-subparagraph (A) or
guidance determined by the department. For the purposes of this
sub-subparagraph, the department, in collaboration with the state
budget office and the house and senate fiscal agencies, may
calculate a student aid index number or may issue administrative
guidance for the student aid index eligibility of students with
more than 1 member of the student's household or the student's
parents' household attending a postsecondary institution during
that academic year. It is intended that the utilization of a
student aid index instead of expected family contribution does not
adversely impact the eligibility of students with multiple members
of the student's household or student's parents' household
attending postsecondary institutions. It is further intended that
the legislature and executive branch work collaboratively to use
Michigan achievement scholarship uptake and other relevant data to
establish a more permanent measure of financial need for the
Michigan achievement scholarship for subsequent academic years.
(3) An individual must meet all of the following criteria each
year to be eligible for a Michigan achievement scholarship awarded
under this section:
(a) Maintain residency in this state, as determined for
purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid.
(b) Have graduated from high school in this state with a
diploma or certificate of completion or achieved a high school
equivalency certificate in 2023 or after.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(c) Be a full-time undergraduate student at an eligible
institution, as defined by that eligible institution, and be a
first-time enrollee in an eligible institution during the 2023-2024
academic year, or a subsequent academic year, within 15 24 months
after high school graduation or attainment of a high school
equivalency certificate or have received a Michigan achievement
scholarship in a previous academic year. For the purposes of this
subdivision, participation in a dual enrollment, early college, or
other similar program while attending high school does not
disqualify a student from being considered a first-time enrollee.
(d) Maintain satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the
eligible institution in which the student is enrolled.
(e) Not be in default on a federal student loan.
(f) Apply for all available gift aid for each academic year in
which the individual applies for a Michigan achievement
scholarship.
(g) For a student who is enrolled at an eligible institution
that is a public university or an independent nonprofit college or
university, or who is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program
described in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966
PA 331, MCL 389.121, at an eligible institution, be an SAI eligible
student.
(4) The amount awarded to an eligible student at an eligible
institution must equal 1 of the following, as applicable:
(a) The amount awarded to an eligible student who is enrolled
at an eligible institution that is a community college or federally
recognized tribal college where the student is eligible for that
institution's in-district tuition rate must be equal to the sum of
the last-dollar payment amount. The amount awarded to an eligible
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


student who is eligible for a federal Pell grant under 20 USC 1070a
must include an additional amount of $1,000.00.
(b) The amount awarded to an eligible student who is enrolled
at an eligible institution that is a community college or federally
recognized tribal college where the student is not eligible for
that institution's in-district tuition rate must be the lesser of
the last-dollar payment amount, or the in-district tuition rate.
The amount awarded to an eligible student who is eligible for a
federal Pell grant under 20 USC 1070a must include an additional
amount of $1,000.00.
(c) The amount awarded to an eligible student who is enrolled
at an eligible institution that is a public university or is
enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described in section 121
of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.121, at
an eligible institution must equal the sum of following:
(i) A minimum payment of $2,500.00.
(ii) The lesser of $3,000.00 or the student's last-dollar
payment amount.
(d) The amount awarded to an eligible student at an eligible
institution that is an independent nonprofit college or university
must equal the sum of the following:
(i) A minimum payment of $2,500.00.
(ii) The lesser of $3,000.00 or the student's last-dollar
payment amount.
(e) Money awarded under this subsection for a Michigan
achievement scholarship must be paid to the eligible institution
for credit to the student's account.
(5) Subject to section 248a(3)(f)(i), an eligible student may
receive a Michigan achievement scholarship award under this section
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


or section 248a for a maximum of 5 academic years, not more than 3
of which may be for attending eligible institutions that are
community colleges or federally recognized tribal colleges unless
the student is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program described
in section 121 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331,
MCL 389.121. A student may not receive an award under this section
and section 248a(3)(f)(i) during the same academic year.
(6) The department shall work closely with participating
institutions to provide the highest level of participation and
ensure that all requirements of the program are met.
(7) From the funds appropriated in section 236(7) for the
Michigan achievement scholarships, the department may not use more
than $10,000,000.00 for the purposes of outreach programs to raise
awareness of the Michigan achievement scholarship described in this
section and section 248a and shall ensure that Michigan achievement
scholarships are well publicized and that high school students are
provided information on the program. The department may receive and
expend funds received from outside sources for scholarships,
marketing, or other purposes related to the Michigan achievement
scholarship. The department shall provide the necessary funding and
staff to fully operate the program.
(7) (8) The department shall convene a workgroup to consider
and advise the department on implementing policies for
administering the Michigan achievement scholarship. The workgroup
shall include participation from the Michigan Association of State
Universities and its institutional members, the Michigan College
Access Network, the Michigan Community College Association and its
institutional members, the Michigan Independent Colleges and
Universities and its institutional members, and any other
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


interested stakeholders and offices as determined by the
department. The workgroup shall make recommendations on packaging
order, packaging structure, definitions of terms not otherwise
defined in statute, and other administrative regulatory
requirements as necessary to implement the Michigan achievement
scholarship.
(8) (9) The following reporting obligations apply to the
Michigan achievement scholarship program:
(a) By February 15 of each year, the department shall provide
a written report, organized by eligible institution, to the house
and senate appropriations subcommittees on higher education, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director
that includes the following information for the previous academic
year:
(i) The number of students who qualified for a Michigan
achievement scholarship.
(ii) The number of students who received a Michigan achievement
scholarship.
(iii) The average number of credits earned by students who
received a Michigan achievement scholarship.
(iv) The number of Michigan achievement scholarships that were
canceled due to failure to maintain satisfactory academic progress
as described in subsection (3)(d).
(v) The number of Michigan achievement scholarships that were
canceled due to a student ceasing attendance at an eligible
institution. The number must not include any known transfers to
another eligible institution.
(vi) The number of Michigan achievement scholarships that were
canceled due to a student's failure to maintain full-time status.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(vii) The average Michigan achievement scholarship award per
student, delineated by sector, including community colleges, tribal
colleges, public universities, independent colleges and
universities, and training institutions. As used in this
subparagraph, "training institutions" means training institutions
accepted to participate in the Michigan achievement scholarship
program under section 248a.
(b) Each eligible institution whose students receive awards
under this section shall cooperate with the department in a timely
manner to facilitate the creation of the report under subdivision
(a).
(9) (10) By April 1 of each year, each eligible institution
shall submit a report to the department, the state budget office,
and the house and senate fiscal agencies providing information as
to the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-
time first-time undergraduate students for the immediately
preceding 2 institution fiscal years. If the average amount of
institutional grant aid awarded to full-time first-time
undergraduate students in fiscal year 2024-2025 2025-2026 is less
than the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to full-
time first-time undergraduate students in fiscal year 2023-2024,
2024-2025, the institution shall include in the report a
description of any changes to the institutional financial aid
during the 2 immediately preceding fiscal years. An institution's
report of the average amount of institutional grant aid awarded to
full-time first-time undergraduate students pursuant to this
subsection must be consistent with data most recently reported to
the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System.
(10) (11) For each fiscal year, an eligible institution shall
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


maintain and report its compliance with the following tuition
restraint requirements, as applicable:
(a) For an eligible institution that is a community college,
the tuition restraint described in section 217b.
(b) For an eligible institution that is a public university or
independent nonprofit college or university, the tuition restraint
described in section 241c.
(11) (12) The state budget director shall implement reporting
requirements to ensure that an eligible institution has satisfied
the tuition restraint requirements of this section. The state
budget director has the sole authority to determine if an eligible
institution has met the requirements of this section.
(12) (13) If an eligible institution exceeds the applicable
tuition restraint level for 2 consecutive years, the state budget
director may consider the institution ineligible for funding under
this section in the subsequent academic year.
(13) (14) If an institution is considered ineligible for
funding under this section, the state budget director shall
reevaluate the status of the ineligible institution after 1
academic year.
(14) (15) It is the intent of the legislature that an eligible
institution will not make reductive changes to scholarship or
financial aid programs offered by that eligible institution that
have the goal or net effect of shifting the cost burden of those
programs to the program described in this section.
Sec. 254. The Subject to sections 217g and 275l, the sums
appropriated in sections 236 and 236e for the state competitive
scholarship, tuition incentive, tuition grant, Michigan reconnect,
and Michigan achievement scholarship programs must be paid out of
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


the state treasury and must be distributed to the respective
institutions under a quarterly payment system as follows:
(a) For the state competitive scholarship and tuition grant
programs, 50% must be paid at the beginning of the state's first
fiscal quarter, 30% during the state's second fiscal quarter, 10%
during the state's third fiscal quarter, and 10% during the state's
fourth fiscal quarter.
(b) For the tuition incentive program, Michigan reconnect, and
Michigan achievement scholarship, 65% must be paid at the beginning
of the state's first fiscal quarter, and 35% during the state's
second fiscal quarter.
Sec. 256. (1) The funds appropriated in section 236 for the
tuition incentive program must be distributed as provided in this
section and pursuant to the administrative procedures for the
tuition incentive program of the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Phase I" means the first part of the tuition incentive
program defined as the academic period of 80 semester or 120 term
credits, or less, leading to an associate degree or certificate.
Students must be enrolled in a certificate or associate degree
program and taking classes within the program of study for a
certificate or associate degree. Tuition will not be covered for
courses outside of a certificate or associate degree program.
(b) "Phase II" means the second part of the tuition incentive
program that provides assistance in the third and fourth year of 4-
year degree programs.
(c) "Department" means the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(d) "High school equivalency certificate" means that term as
defined in section 4.
(3) An individual must meet the following basic criteria and
financial thresholds to be eligible for tuition incentive program
benefits:
(a) To be eligible for phase I, an individual must meet all of
the following criteria:
(i) Be less than 20 years of age at the time the individual
graduates from high school with a diploma or certificate of
completion or achieves a high school equivalency certificate or,
for students attending a 5-year middle college approved by the
Michigan department of education, be less than 21 years of age when
the individual graduates from high school, or be considered a
special education pupil at the time the individual graduated from
high school as described in section 6(4)(l)(i).
(ii) Be a United States citizen and maintain residency in this
state, as determined for purposes of the Free Application for
Federal Student Aid.
(iii) Be at least a half-time student, earning less than 80
semester or 120 term credits at a participating educational
institution within 4 years of high school graduation or achievement
of a high school equivalency certificate. All program eligibility
expires 10 years after initial enrollment at a participating
educational institution.
(iv) Meet the satisfactory academic progress policy of the
educational institution attended by the individual.
(b) To be eligible for phase II, an individual must meet
either of the following criteria in addition to the criteria in
subdivision (a):
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(i) Complete at least 56 transferable semester or 84
transferable term credits.
(ii) Obtain an associate degree or certificate at a
participating institution.
(c) To be eligible for phase I or phase II, an individual must
be financially eligible as determined by the department. An
individual is financially eligible for the tuition incentive
program if the individual was eligible for Medicaid from this state
for 24 months within any 36 months prior to completion of high
school or achievement of a high school equivalency certificate. The
department shall accept certification of Medicaid eligibility only
from the department of health and human services for the purposes
of verifying if a person is Medicaid eligible for 24 months within
any 36 months prior to completion of high school or achievement of
a high school equivalency certificate. Certification of eligibility
may begin in the sixth grade.
(4) For phase I, the department shall provide payment on
behalf of a person eligible under subsection (3). The department
shall only accept standard per-credit hour tuition billings and
shall reject billings that are excessive or outside the guidelines
for the type of educational institution.
(5) For phase I, all of the following apply:
(a) Payments for associate degree or certificate programs must
not be made for more than 80 semester or 120 term credits for any
individual student at any participating institution. The department
shall not do either of the following:
(i) Adopt or apply any total semester-credit or term-credit
maximum that is less than the 80 semester-credit or 120 term-credit
maximum provided in this subdivision.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(ii) Adopt or apply any per-semester or per-term credit maximum
for a student whose semester-credit or term-credit load will not
result in exceeding the total 80 semester-credit or 120 term-credit
maximum provided in this subdivision.
(b) For persons enrolled at a Michigan community college, the
department shall pay the current in-district tuition and mandatory
fees. For persons residing in an area that is not included in any
community college district, the out-of-district tuition rate may be
authorized.
(c) For persons enrolled at a Michigan public university, the
department shall pay lower division resident tuition and mandatory
fees for the current year. 1 of the following, as applicable:
(i) For awards made during academic year 2026-2027, or a prior
academic year, lower division resident tuition and mandatory fees
for the current year.
(ii) For awards made during academic year 2027-2028 or a
subsequent academic year, mandatory fees for the current year and a
per-credit payment that does not exceed 2.5 times the average
community college in-district per-credit tuition rate as reported
by the last business day of August for the immediately preceding
academic year.
(d) For persons enrolled at a Michigan independent, nonprofit
degree-granting college or university or a Michigan federal
tribally controlled community college, the department shall pay
mandatory fees for the current year and a per-credit payment that
does not exceed the average community college in-district per-
credit tuition rate as reported by the last business day of August
for the immediately preceding academic year.
(6) A person participating in phase II may be eligible for
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


additional funds not to exceed $500.00 per semester or $400.00 per
term up to a maximum of $2,000.00 subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Credits are earned in a 4-year program at a Michigan
degree-granting 4-year college or university.
(b) The tuition reimbursement is for coursework completed
within 30 months of completion of the phase I requirements.
(7) The department shall work closely with participating
institutions to provide the highest level of participation and
ensure that all requirements of the program are met.
(8) The department shall notify students in an age-appropriate
manner of their financial eligibility for the program any time
after the student begins sixth grade.
(9) Except as otherwise provided in sections 13(c) and 17 of
the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL
390.1713 and 390.1717, each institution shall ensure that all known
available restricted grants for tuition and fees are used before
billing the tuition incentive program for any portion of a
student's tuition and fees.
(10) The department shall ensure that the tuition incentive
program is well publicized and that eligible Medicaid clients are
provided information on the program. The department shall provide
the necessary funding and staff to fully operate the program.
(11) The department shall collaborate with the center to use
the P-20 longitudinal data system to report the following
information for each qualified postsecondary institution:
(a) The number of phase I students in the most recently
completed academic year who in any academic year received a tuition
incentive program award and who successfully completed a degree or
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


certificate program. Cohort graduation rates for phase I students
must be calculated using the established success rate methodology
developed by the center in collaboration with the postsecondary
institutions.
(b) The number of students in the most recently completed
academic year who in any academic year received a Pell grant at the
reporting institution and who successfully completed a degree or
certificate program. Cohort graduation rates for students who
received Pell grants must be calculated using the established
success rate methodology developed by the center in collaboration
with the postsecondary institutions.
(12) If a qualified postsecondary institution does not report
the data necessary to complete the reporting in subsection (11) to
the P-20 longitudinal data system by October 15 for the prior
academic year, the department shall not award phase I tuition
incentive program funding to otherwise eligible students enrolled
in that institution until the data are submitted.
Sec. 263. (1) Included in the appropriation in section 236 for
fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 for MSU AgBioResearch is
$2,982,900.00 and included in the appropriation in section 236 for
MSU Extension is $2,645,200.00 for Project GREEEN. Project GREEEN
is intended to address critical regulatory, food safety, economic,
and environmental problems faced by this state's plant-based
agriculture, forestry, and processing industries. "GREEEN" is an
acronym for Generating Research and Extension to Meet Environmental
and Economic Needs.
(2) The department of agriculture and rural development and
Michigan State University, in consultation with agricultural
commodity groups and other interested parties, shall develop
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


Project GREEEN and its program priorities.
Sec. 263b. Included in the appropriation in section 236 for
fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 for MSU AgBioResearch and MSU
Extension is funding for the Agricultural Climate Resiliency
Program. The Agricultural Climate Resiliency Program is intended to
address environmental sustainability of Michigan agriculture and
promote the protection and efficient use of Michigan's water
resources.
Sec. 264. Included in the appropriation in section 236 for
fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 for Michigan State University is
$80,000.00 for the Michigan Future Farmers of America Association.
This $80,000.00 allocation must not supplant any existing support
that Michigan State University provides to the Michigan Future
Farmers of America Association.
Sec. 268. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026,
2027, it is the intent of the legislature that funds be allocated
for unfunded North American Indian tuition waiver costs incurred by
public universities under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253,
from the general fund.
(2) By January 15 of each year, the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential shall annually submit to the
state budget director, the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on higher education, and the house and senate fiscal
agencies a report on North American Indian tuition waivers for the
preceding academic year that includes, but is not limited to, all
of the following information:
(a) The number of waiver applications received and the number
of waiver applications approved.
(b) For each public university submitting information under
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


subsection (3), all of the following:
(i) The number of graduate and undergraduate North American
Indian Native American students enrolled each term for the previous
academic year.
(ii) The number of North American Indian waivers granted each
term, including to continuing education students, and the monetary
value of the waivers for granted each term of the previous academic
year.
(iii) The number of North American Indian Native American
students who receive a granted waiver for the previous academic
year.
(iv) The number of graduate and undergraduate students
attending under a North American Indian tuition waiver who withdrew
from the public university each term during the previous academic
year. For purposes of this subparagraph, a withdrawal occurs when a
student who has been awarded the waiver withdraws from the
institution at any point during the term, regardless of enrollment
in subsequent terms.
(v) The number of graduate and undergraduate students
attending under a North American Indian tuition waiver who
successfully transfer to a 4-year public or private university, or
complete a degree or certificate program, separated by degree or
certificate level, and the graduation rate for graduate and
undergraduate students attending under a North American Indian
tuition waiver who complete a degree or certificate within 150% of
the normal time to complete, separated by the level of the degree
or certificate.
(3) By January 1 of each year, a public university that
receives an appropriation in section 236, or a tribal college
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


receiving pass-through funds under section 269, 270, or 270c, shall
provide to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential any information necessary for preparing the report
detailed in subsection (2), using guidelines and procedures
developed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential.
(4) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and
potential may consolidate the report required under this section
with the report required under section 223, but a consolidated
report must separately identify data for public universities and
data for community colleges.
Sec. 269. For fiscal year 2025-2026, 2026-2027, from the
amount appropriated in section 236 to Central Michigan University
for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver,
$80,800.00 $96,700.00 must be paid to Saginaw Chippewa Tribal
College for the costs of waiving tuition for North American Indians
under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253. It is the intent of
the legislature that Saginaw Chippewa Tribal College provide the
department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential the
necessary information for the college to be included in the report
required under section 268.
Sec. 270. For fiscal year 2025-2026, 2026-2027, from the
amount appropriated in section 236 to Lake Superior State
University for costs incurred under the North American Indian
tuition waiver, $498,800.00 $465,000.00 must be paid to Bay Mills
Community College for the costs of waiving tuition for North
American Indians under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253. It is
the intent of the legislature that Bay Mills Community College
provide the department of lifelong education, advancement, and
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


potential the necessary information for the college to be included
in the report required under section 268.
Sec. 270c. For fiscal year 2025-2026, 2026-2027, from the
amount appropriated in section 236 to Northern Michigan University
for costs incurred under the North American Indian tuition waiver,
$105,700.00 $112,200.00 is to be paid to Keweenaw Bay Ojibwa
Community College for the costs of waiving tuition for North
American Indians under 1976 PA 174, MCL 390.1251 to 390.1253. It is
the intent of the legislature that Keweenaw Bay Ojibwa Community
College provide the department of lifelong education, advancement,
and potential the necessary information for the community college
to be included in the report required under section 268.
Sec. 275l. (1) Subject to subsection (2), the state treasurer
shall reduce payments made under section 254 for any public
university that is an authorizing body by an amount equal to the
difference between the amount reported under section 275k(1)(m)(i)
during the previous fiscal year and 1% times the total state school
aid received by all public school academies authorized by the
authorizing body during that fiscal year. The state treasurer may
coordinate with the state budget office or any other state
department or agency to administer this section.
(2) If the calculation under subsection (1) would result in a
net payment under section 254 that is a negative number, the
payment under section 254 must be $0.00.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Authorizing body" means that term as defined in section
501 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.501.
(b) "Total state school aid" means that term as used in
section 502 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.502.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


Sec. 275n. A student may not receive an award under a
scholarship program receiving an appropriation under section 236(7)
under either of the following conditions:
(a) The student is enrolled in a program of study leading to a
degree in theology, divinity, or religious education.
(b) The student is enrolled at a college or university that
does not have a board-approved policy of inclusion and
nondiscrimination that includes race, ethnicity, citizenship,
color, religion, gender and gender identity, sexual orientation,
national origin, veteran status, ability status, or any other
characteristic protected under the Elliott-Larsen civil rights act,
1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804.
Sec. 275o. (1) By December 31, 2026, each public university
that receives an appropriation under section 236 shall produce a
report detailing any increases, decreases, or other substantive
changes to diversity, equity, and inclusion programs made after
January 1, 2026.
(2) If the report described in subsection (1) documents a
change that could reduce access to a diversity, equity, or
inclusion program for that university's students or employees, the
university shall also report other efforts, programs, or resources
that the university provides that would serve to mitigate any
negative consequences associated with the documented program
reduction.
Sec. 276. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year
2025-2026 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is
funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez Dolores
Huerta – Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks future faculty fellowship
program that is intended to increase the pool of academically or
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


economically disadvantaged candidates pursuing faculty or
administration careers in postsecondary education in this state.
Preference may not be given to applicants on the basis of race,
color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should
encourage applications from applicants who would otherwise not
adequately be represented in the graduate student, faculty, or
administration populations. Each public university shall apply the
percentage change applicable to every public university in the
calculation of appropriations in section 236 to the amount of funds
allocated to the future faculty fellowship program.
(2) Each public university shall administer the program in a
manner prescribed by the department of labor and economic
opportunity. The department of labor and economic opportunity shall
use a good-faith effort standard to evaluate whether a fellowship
is in default. All of the following apply to the program:
(a) By June 15 of each year, public universities shall report
any anticipated unexpended or unencumbered program funds to the
department of labor and economic opportunity. Encumbered funds are
those funds that were committed by a fellowship agreement that is
signed during the current fiscal year or administrative expenses
that have been approved by the department of labor and economic
opportunity.
(b) Before September 1 of each year, unexpended or
unencumbered funds may be transferred, under the direction of the
department of labor and economic opportunity, to a future faculty
fellowship program at another public university to be awarded to an
eligible candidate at that public university.
(c) Program allocations not expended or encumbered by
September 30, 2027 2028 must be returned to the department of labor
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


and economic opportunity so that those funds may lapse to the state
general fund.
(d) Not more than 5% of each public university's allocation
for the program may be used for administration of the program.
(e) In addition to the appropriation for fiscal year 2025-
2026, 2026-2027, any revenue received during prior fiscal years by
the department of labor and economic opportunity from defaulted
fellowship agreements is appropriated for the purposes originally
intended.
Sec. 277. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year
2025-2026 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is
funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez Dolores
Huerta – Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks college day program that is
intended to introduce academically or economically disadvantaged
schoolchildren to the potential of a college education in this
state. Preference may not be given to participants on the basis of
race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Public
universities should encourage participation from those who would
otherwise not adequately be represented in the student population.
(2) Individual program plans of each public university must
include a budget of equal contributions from this program, the
participating public university, the participating school district,
and the participating independent degree-granting college. College
day funds must not be expended to cover indirect costs. Not more
than 20% of the university match may be attributable to indirect
costs. Each public university shall apply the percentage change
applicable to every public university in the calculation of
appropriations in section 236 to the amount of funds allocated to
the college day program.
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


(3) Each public university shall administer the program
described in this section in a manner prescribed by the department
of labor and economic opportunity.
Sec. 278. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year
2025-2026 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is
funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez Dolores
Huerta – Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks select student support
services program for developing academically or economically
disadvantaged student retention programs for 4-year public and
independent educational institutions in this state. Preference may
not be given to participants on the basis of race, color,
ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should
encourage participation from those who would otherwise not
adequately be represented in the student population.
(2) An award made under this program to any 1 institution must
not be greater than $150,000.00, must have an award period of no
more than 2 years, and must be matched on a 70% state, 30% college
or university basis.
(3) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall
administer the program described in this section.
Sec. 279. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year
2025-2026 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is
funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez Dolores
Huerta – Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks college/university
partnership program between 4-year public and independent colleges
and universities and public community colleges, which is intended
to increase the number of academically or economically
disadvantaged students who transfer from community colleges into
baccalaureate programs in this state. Preference may not be given
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


to participants on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or
national origin. Institutions should encourage participation from
those who would otherwise not adequately be represented in the
transfer student population.
(2) The grants must be made under the program described in
this section to Michigan public and independent colleges and
universities. An award to any 1 institution must not be greater
than $150,000.00, must have an award period of no more than 2
years, and must be matched on a 70% state, 30% college or
university basis.
(3) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall
administer the program described in this section.
Sec. 280. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year
2025-2026 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is
funding for the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez Dolores
Huerta – Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks visiting professors program,
which is intended to increase the number of instructors in the
classroom to provide role models for academically or economically
disadvantaged students. Preference may not be given to participants
on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender, or national origin.
Public universities should encourage participation from those who
would otherwise not adequately be represented in the student
population.
(2) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall
administer the program described in this section.
(3) The amount allocated to each public university is
$11,184.00 and is subject to an award period of no more than 2
years. Each public university receiving funds for fiscal year 2025-
2026 2026-2027 under this section shall report to the department of
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


labor and economic opportunity by April 15, 2026 2027 the amount of
its unobligated and unexpended funds as of March 31, 2026 2027 and
a plan to expend the remaining funds by the end of the fiscal year.
The amount of funding reported as not being expended may be
transferred, under the direction of the department, to another
public university for use under this section.
Sec. 281. (1) Included in the appropriation for fiscal year
2025-2026 2026-2027 for each public university in section 236 is
funding under the Martin Luther King, Jr. - Cesar Chavez Dolores
Huerta – Morris Hood Jr. - Rosa Parks initiative for the Morris
Hood, Jr. educator development program, which is intended to
increase the number of academically or economically disadvantaged
students who enroll in and complete K-12 teacher education programs
at the baccalaureate level and teach in this state. Preference may
not be given to participants on the basis of race, color,
ethnicity, gender, or national origin. Institutions should
encourage participation from those who would otherwise not
adequately be represented in the teacher education student
population.
(2) The program described in this section must be administered
by each state-approved teacher education institution in a manner
prescribed by the department of labor and economic opportunity.
(3) Approved teacher education institutions may and are
encouraged to use select student support services funding in
coordination with the Morris Hood, Jr. funding to achieve the goals
of the program described in this section.
Sec. 282. (1) Each institution receiving funds for fiscal year
2025-2026 2026-2027 under section 278, 279, or 281 shall provide to
the department of labor and economic opportunity by April 15, 2026
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


2027 the unobligated and unexpended funds as of March 31, 2026 2027
and a plan to expend the remaining funds by the end of the fiscal
year. Notwithstanding the award limitations in sections 278 and
279, the amount of funding reported as not being expended will be
reallocated to the institutions that intend to expend all funding
received under section 278, 279, or 281.
(2) Funds received for the purpose of administering programs
under sections 278, 279, and 281 must not be used for direct
financial aid or indirect financial aid. However, a public
university may provide academic incentives to motivate
participating students as approved by the department. As used in
this subsection:
(a) "Direct financial aid" includes, but is not limited to,
scholarships, payment of tuition, stipends, and work-studies.
(b) "Indirect financial aid" includes, but is not limited to,
transportation, textbook allowances, child care support, and
assistance with medical premiums or expenses.
Sec. 287. Not later than December 1 of each year, each public
university that receives an appropriation in section 236 shall
provide a report to the house and senate appropriations
subcommittees on higher education, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget director providing an itemized cost
of attendance for full-time students attending that public
university for the current and previous 2 academic years.
Enacting section 1. In accordance with section 30 of article
IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from
state sources for higher education for fiscal year 2026-2027 under
article III of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL
388.1836 to 388.1891, as amended by this amendatory act, is
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1


estimated at $2,586,932,800.00 and the amount of that state
spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government
for fiscal year 2026-2027 is estimated at $0.00.
Enacting section 2. Section 241h of the state school aid act
of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1841h is repealed effective October 1,
2026.
Enacting section 3. This amendatory act takes effect October
1, 2026.
Final Page
KHS S06120'26 (S-1) bmnah1